Delaware, session 153, SB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 45, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows and by redesignating accordingly: Â§ 4505. Postconviction remedy â change in scientific information. (a) Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: (1) âConvictionâ means a verdict of guilty by the trier of fact, whether judge or jury, or a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court, or a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity under Â§ 401 et seq. of this Title. âConvicted personâ means a person who has received such a conviction. (2) âForensic scienceâ means the application of scientific or technical practices to the recognition, collection, analysis, and interpretation of evidence for criminal and civil law or regulatory issues. (3) âForensic scientific evidenceâ means scientific or technical information, a forensic expertâs scientific or technical opinion, report, or testimony, laboratory procedures and policies, and any other relevant scientific knowledge or scientific or technical material. (4) âScientific knowledgeâ is broadly defined to mean evidence-based information produced by the general scientific community or relevant scientific fields. (b) Applicability and basis for relief. (1) This section applies to relevant forensic scientific evidence that satisfies any of the following: a. The evidence was not available to be offered by a person prior to that personâs conviction. b. The evidence undermines forensic scientific evidence presented before or at trial or before the date of entry of a plea. (2) A court shall grant a convicted person relief if all of the following are satisfied: a. The convicted person files an application asserting that relevant forensic scientific evidence is currently available and was not ascertainable through the exercise of reasonable diligence by the convicted person before or during trial or before the date of entry of a plea. b. The court determines that, had the evidence been presented before or during trial or before the date of entry of a plea, there is a reasonable probability that there would have been a different outcome or that the convicted person would not have been convicted. (3) In determining whether relevant forensic scientific evidence was not ascertainable through the exercise of reasonable diligence, the court shall consider whether the relevant scientific evidence has changed since: a. For a determination made with respect to an original application, the applicable trial date or dates, or the date of entry of plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere. b. For a determination made with respect to a subsequent application, the date on which the original application or a previously considered application was filed. (4) This section does not create any liability for an expert who repudiates an opinion the expert provided at a hearing or trial or whose opinion has been undermined by later scientific research or technological advancements. (c) Eligibility. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a convicted person who contends that the convicted person did not commit the crime that resulted in conviction may file, at any time, a petition relating to forensic evidence that was not ascertainable through the exercise of reasonable diligence or that undermines forensic scientific evidence presented before or during trial or before the date of entry of a plea. Eligible applicants include: (1) Persons currently incarcerated in a Department of Correction facility or the Delaware Psychiatric Center, on parole or probation, or subject to registration on the sex offender registry. (2) Persons convicted after trial or after entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere. (3) Persons deemed to have provided a confession or admission related to the crime, either before or after conviction. (4) Persons who have completed their sentences. (d) Filing and service. The petition must be filed in the Superior Court. The court shall fix a time to hear the claim that is no later than 180 days after the date the petition was filed and shall mail notice of the hearing to the petitioner and the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice may file a response to the petition no later than 90 days after the date the petition was filed. (e) Review by the court. (1) If, upon reviewing the petition, the court determines that the petitioner failed to make a prima facie showing of the requirements for relief as defined in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall dismiss the petition in writing. (2) If, upon reviewing the petition, the court determines that the petitioner made a prima facie showing of the requirements for relief as defined in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall take the following actions: a. Grant the petitioner additional discovery on matters related to forensic evidence used to obtain the conviction or sentence at issue, including documents pertaining to the original criminal investigation or the identities of other suspects. The court shall interpret the petitioner's right to discovery broadly. b. Hold a hearing on the petitionerâs claims to determine whether the petitioner has met the requirements of paragraph (b)(2) of this section. If the court determines that the petitioner has met the requirements of paragraph (b)(2) of this section, it shall vacate the petitionerâs conviction and grant the petitionerâs motion for a new trial. (3) A petitioner may appeal a dismissal within 30 days after dismissal is entered.